Washington statutes.
RCW 24.24.040

Membership certificates.

If the corporation shall not be a joint stock company, then it may provide by its bylaws for issuing to the several bodies represented in its membership certificates of participation, which shall evidence the respective equitable interests of such bodies in the properties held by such corporation.

[ 1927 c 190 s 4; RRS s 3887-4.]